Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-619
Licensee; board; require financial statement; confidential.

The board may, at any time, require a licensee to submit a verified financial statement for examination so that it may determine whether the licensee is financially responsible to carry on a collection agency business within the intents and purposes of the Collection Agency Act. Any financial statement submitted by a licensee shall be confidential and not a public record unless introduced in evidence at a hearing conducted by the board.

Laws 1963, c. 500, § 23, p. 1602;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-8,180;

Laws 1984, LB 471, § 19;

Laws 1993, LB 261, § 17.